Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1739.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 34ALL PAYOR CLAIMS DATABASESec.3401. Scope of chapter.3402. Declaration of policy.3403. Definitions.3404. Establishment of database.3405. Contracting authority.3406. Advisory group.3407. Data collection.3408. Technical guidance.12345678910111213141516171819 3409. Data analysis and review.3410. Public reports and databases.3411. Confidentiality and information sharing.3412. Grievances.3413. Enforcement and penalties.§ 3401. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to establishing an All Payor Claims Database.§ 3402. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares that the establishment of an All Payor Claims Database would:(1) Facilitate the reporting of health care and health quality data.(2) Promote the transparency of the price of health care services through easily understandable and reliable public reporting that will enable consumers to assess quality and out-of-pocket costs before receiving health care services.(3) Support the regulation of health insurance and health insurers by the Insurance Department.(4) Support payors for and providers of health care services in assessing alternative payment models, including value-based care models.(5) Assist regulators in analyzing health care spending trends across different payor types, including Medicaid, CHIP, Medicare and commercial insurance.(6) Support the analysis of market transactions involving health care providers or payors.(7) Enable national, regional and state-by-state comparisons of health care costs.§ 3403. Definitions.20250HB1739PN2141 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"All Payor Claims Database" or "APCD." The database established under section 3404 (relating to establishment of database)."Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Council." The Health Care Cost Containment Council."Data." Information submitted by a provider to a payor relating to a claim for payment for a rendered health care service."Elective payor." A person not otherwise required to comply with the insurance laws of this Commonwealth, including an employer-sponsored self-funded health plan or a Taft-Hartley trust health plan, that elects to voluntarily provide claims data to the APCD within the time frames and in accordance with procedures established by the council."Facility." A health care setting or institution providing a health care service, including:(1) A general, special, psychiatric, rehabilitation or other hospital.(2) An ambulatory surgical facility.(3) A cancer treatment center.(4) A birth center.(5) A skilled nursing center.(6) An inpatient, outpatient or residential drug and alcohol treatment facility.(7) A facility licensed by the Department of Human Services' Office of Mental Health and Substance Abuse 20250HB1739PN2141 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services.(8) A laboratory, imaging, diagnostic or other outpatient medical service or testing facility.(9) A provider office or clinic.(10) An urgent care center.(11) A stand-alone emergency care facility."Health care service." A treatment, admission, procedure, medical supply or equipment, pharmaceutical or other medical health or mental health service prescribed, rendered or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided to an enrollee, policyholder, certificate-holder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a payor payment arrangement in this Commonwealth for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, illness, injury or disease or functional limitation, including emergency medical services as defined in section 8103 (relating to definitions) and pharmacy benefits management as defined in section 103 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."Health insurer." An entity licensed in this Commonwealth to issue health insurance, subscriber contracts, certifications or plans that provide medical or health care coverage by a provider that is offered or governed under:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Chs. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) and 63 (relating to professional health 20250HB1739PN2141 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services plan corporations)."Out-of-pocket costs." Costs charged directly to an individual for services received by the individual or the individual's dependent, including deductibles, co-insurance, copayments and similar out-of-pocket expenses."Payor." A person that makes payments to facilities or providers for health care services rendered to an enrollee, policyholder, certificate holder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy or other payor payment arrangement. The term does not include an individual making a payment for out-of-pocket costs."Payor payment arrangement." A promise to pay for health care services. The term does not include a health insurance policy."Provider." A person licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of this Commonwealth or any other state to provide or perform a health care service in the ordinary course of business or practice and any other person that furnishes, bills or is paid for a health care service in the normal course of business, including, but not limited to, a physician, podiatrist, optometrist, psychologist, physical therapist, certified nurse practitioner, registered nurse, nurse midwife, physician's assistant, chiropractor, dentist, pharmacist, individual accredited or certified to provide behavioral health services, a facility, nursing home, assisted living provider, home health agency, medical equipment supplier, emergency medical services agency or an individual providing an emergency service on behalf of an emergency medical services agency as those terms are defined in section 8103 (relating to 20250HB1739PN2141 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions) or any other health care provider as defined under 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions)."Purchaser." A corporation, labor organization or other person that purchases benefits which provide health care services for employees or members, either through a health care insurer or by means of a self-funded program of benefits and a certified bargaining representative that represents a group or groups of employees for whom employers purchase a program of benefits which provide health care services. The term does not include a health insurer.§ 3404. Establishment of database.(a) Establishment.--The All Payor Claims Database shall be established within 60 days of receipt of an appropriation under subsection (b)(1). Prior to establishment of the APCD, the commissioner may take action necessary to effectuate the prompt establishment of the APCD, including, on behalf of the council, to contract with one or more vendors for initial development of the APCD.(b) Appropriations.--(1) The General Assembly:(i) Shall appropriate not less than $4,000,000 for the establishment of the APCD.(ii) May annually appropriate General Fund money to the council to pay for expenses related to the APCD.(2) If there is not sufficient funding to finance the ongoing operations of the APCD, the council shall cease APCD operations. If the APCD ceases to operate, the data submitted shall be destroyed or returned to its original source.(c) Council duties.--The council shall:(1) Oversee the collection, aggregation and analysis of 20250HB1739PN2141 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 data collected under sections 3407 (relating to data collection) and 3409 (relating to data analysis and review).(2) Establish data access policies in accordance with sections 3410 (relating to public reports and databases) and 3411 (relating to confidentiality and information sharing).(3) Develop and implement data privacy and security protocols to safeguard against the misuse of data and ensure patient confidentiality and compliance with applicable Federal and State privacy laws and regulations, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936), the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5, 123 Stat. 226-279 and 467-496) and implementing regulations.(4) Implement the reporting requirements in a cost-effective and reasonable manner to produce reliable and timely information.(5) Determine the reports and data on quality, health outcomes, health disparities, cost, utilization and pricing to be made available to the public.(6) Make recommendations for further study and data collection to carry out the purposes of this chapter and facilitate informed choices by consumers . § 3405. Contracting authority.(a) Procurements.--In addition to and consistent with any contract entered into by the commissioner under section 3404(a) (relating to establishment of database), the council shall contract with one or more vendors for the development and maintenance of the APCD.(b) Requirements and considerations.--20250HB1739PN2141 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A vendor must satisfy the requirements of 42 CFR 401.705 (relating to eligibility criteria for qualified entities) and 401.707 (relating to operating and governance requirements for qualified entities).(2) The council shall consider all of the following in determining a vendor:(i) The vendor's degree of experience in health care data collection, analysis, analytics and security.(ii) Whether the vendor has a long-term self-sustainable financial model.(iii) The vendor's experience in convening and effectively engaging stakeholders to develop reports, especially among groups of health providers, health insurers, carriers and self-insured purchasers.(iv) The vendor's experience in meeting budget and time lines for report generation.(v) The vendor's ability to combine cost and quality data to assess total cost of care.(c) Use of experts.--(1) The council may contract with competent experts, including legal, actuarial or economic experts, to assist the council in the review of any matter within the scope of this chapter, including auditing the accuracy of data submitted. The council may bill reasonable and necessary costs for the services of an expert to:(i) the nongovernmental payors on a pro rata basis based on the number of covered lives in proportion to all covered lives by those nongovernmental payors; or(ii) a data supplier if the services are particular as to that data supplier, other than a governmental 20250HB1739PN2141 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payor.(2) Within 30 days of its receipt of a bill for the services, the payor shall make payment directly to the expert and shall provide confirmation of payment to the council.(d) Procurements within one year.--The contracts entered into under this section shall be subject to the requirements of section 3314 (relating to contracts with vendors) for one year after the effective date of this subsection.§ 3406. Advisory group.In addition to the advisory groups established under section 3303(g) and (h) (relating to Health Care Cost Containment Council), the council shall establish an APCD advisory group that shall include the Secretary of Health, the Secretary of Human Services and the commissioner, who shall be chairman. The duties of the APCD advisory group shall include, but not be limited to, advising the council on the following:(1) The data elements to be collected and methods of collection.(2) The reporting formats for data submitted.(3) The use and reporting of any data submitted.(4) Coordination of public and private health care quality and performance measures.(5) The utilization of publicly available data in combination with data collected by the APCD, where appropriate.(6) The types of reports to be made available to the public.(7) The types of databases to be maintained to facilitate independent research and consumer usability.§ 3407. Data collection.20250HB1739PN2141 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Data suppliers.--The following persons shall submit data to the council upon request:(1) Nongovernmental payors, including:(i) Insurers, including health insurers, for policies subject to regulation by the Insurance Department under which a claim described in subsection (b) is paid, including policies that provide the following types of coverage:(A) Health insurance.(B) Accident only.(C) Credit only.(D) Long-term care or disability income.(E) Specified disease.(F) Medicare supplement.(G) Fixed indemnity.(H) Dental only.(I) Vision only.(J) Workers' compensation.(K) Automobile medical payment.(L) Any other coverage policy regulated by the Insurance Department under which health care claims may be paid.(ii) Issuers or administrators of coverage under Medicare Advantage Part C under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.), insofar as not prohibited by Federal law . (iii) Third-party administrators paying claims on behalf of health plans in this Commonwealth, for:(A) Fully insured health plans.(B) Elective payors, at the direction of the 20250HB1739PN2141 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elective payor.(2) Governmental payors, including:(i) The Commonwealth's Medical Assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, including entities contracted to provide services under the program.(ii) The Children's Health Insurance Program under Article XXIII-A of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including entities contracted to provide services under the program.(iii) Health care coverage provided by the Commonwealth, a county, a city or other State or local governmental entity or an agency, subdivision or department of a governmental entity, including:(A) A corporation or other arrangement organized by the entity for the provision of health care coverage and subject to control by the entity or an instrumentality of the entity . (B) The Pennsylvania Employee Benefit Trust Fund for active and retired employees.(iv) Issuers or administrators of coverage under Medicare Parts A and B under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, insofar as not prohibited by Federal law. (v) Issuers or administrators of policies under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents, insofar as not prohibited by Federal law.(vi) Issuers or administrators of a health care plan 20250HB1739PN2141 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided through the Federal Employees Health Benefits Program established under 5 U.S.C. Ch. 89 (relating to health insurance), insofar as not prohibited by Federal law.(3) Providers.(4) Facilities.(b) Claims data subject to collection.--The data provided under subsection (a) must be provided for at least the following:(1) Types of claims:(i) Medical health.(ii) Mental health.(iii) Dental health.(iv) Substance use disorders.(v) Emergency services, including transport and care . (vi) Pharmaceuticals.(vii) Durable medical equipment.(2) Types of providers:(i) Inpatient.(ii) Outpatient, including at ambulatory surgical facilities.(iii) Primary.(iv) Specialist.(v) Pharmacy.(c) Categories of data.--The council shall collect data as to each type of claim identified in subsection (b) to include:(1) Demographic information, including the patient's gender, age and geographic area of residency.(2) Information relating to an individual episode of 20250HB1739PN2141 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care, including the date and time of the patient's admission and discharge, the identity of the health care services provider and the location and type of facility, such as a hospital, office or clinic, where the service was provided.(3) Information describing the nature of health care services provided to the patient in connection with the encounter, visit or service, including diagnosis codes.(4) Health insurance product type, such as HMO or PPO.(5) Pricing and payment information, including a facility's or provider's billed and accepted amounts, a payor's allowed and paid amounts and a consumer's out-of-pocket costs.(6) Service frequency data, including admission and re-admission and visit frequency data.(7) Patient engagement and compliance data, including medication adherence.(d) Format of data submission.--The council is authorized to collect, and data suppliers are required to submit upon request of the council, all data required in this section in a uniform format.(e) Timing of data submission.--Each data supplier shall timely submit all data required in this section in accordance with the following:(1) On or before the 15th day of each month, each data supplier shall submit data relating to the prior month.(2) On or before April 1 of each year following the effective date of this paragraph, each data supplier shall submit an annual report compiling the data relating to the prior calendar year.(f) Submission.--Unless modified or supplemented by 20250HB1739PN2141 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations promulgated under this chapter, in instances where more than one entity is involved in the administration of a policy, a health insurer shall be responsible for submitting the claims data for policies that the health insurer has written, and the third-party administrator shall be responsible for submitting claims data for elective payor plans that it administers.(g) Administrative penalties.--(1) A data supplier that fails to submit data shall be subject to an administrative penalty of $1,000 for each day that the required data is not provided in accordance with this section.(2) A data supplier that fails to correct data as required under subsection (h)(2) within 30 days of the request to correct the data shall be subject to an administrative penalty of $1,000 for each day that the required corrected data is not provided in accordance with this section.(3) A data supplier may be subject to the administrative penalties in paragraph (1) and (2).(h) Review and correction.--(1) The council's vendor shall review and validate all data submitted within 60 days of receipt.(2) If data fails validation, the council's vendor shall direct a data source to correct the data within 30 days.§ 3408. Technical guidance.(a) Content.--(1) The council shall publish technical guidance, in accordance with subsection (b), to establish uniform submission formats, coding systems and other technical 20250HB1739PN2141 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specifications necessary to render the incoming data substantially valid, consistent, compatible and manageable using electronic data processing according to data submission schedules.(2) Technical guidance shall avoid, to the extent possible, submission of identical data from more than one data supplier. The uniform submission formats, coding systems and other technical specifications may be established by the council pursuant to its authority under section 3304 (relating to power and duties of council). If payor data is requested by the council, it shall, to the extent possible, be obtained from primary payor sources. The council shall not require a data supplier to contract with any specific vendor for submission of any specific data elements to the council.(b) Publication and notice.--The council shall publish technical guidance under this subsection not more than once each year in accordance with the following:(1) The council shall publish draft and final technical guidance by transmitting notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and by:(i) Posting the technical guidance on the council's publicly accessible Internet website.(ii) Electronically sending notice to the chair and minority chair of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.20250HB1739PN2141 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Electronically sending notice to a contact person or electronic mailing address as identified by the person, to the council, of the Hospital Association of Pennsylvania or a successor organization, the Pennsylvania Medical Society, or a successor organization and all health insurers offering comprehensive health insurance to the individual in this Commonwealth.(2) There shall be a 60-day comment period after publication of draft technical guidance.(3) Final technical guidance shall be published in accordance with paragraph (1) and may not take effect until 30 days after the end of the comment period under paragraph (2).§ 3409. Data analysis and review.The council and a vendor retained under section 3405 (relating to contracting authority) shall provide access to the data and provide data analysis upon request to:(1) The Insurance Department, for use in at least the following:(i) Product regulation, including form and rate review.(ii) Network adequacy regulation.(iii) Market actions, investigations, examinations and other enforcement actions.(iv) Promoting price and quality transparency for consumers.(v) Mediating contract negotiations between providers and payors.(2) The Department of Health and the Department of Human Services, for use in at least the following:20250HB1739PN2141 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Analyzing health care spending trend analysis, including across payor types.(ii) Analyzing health outcomes and disparities.(iii) Monitoring public health initiatives.(iv) Supporting program development and evaluation of those programs.(v) Supporting health care quality reporting.(vi) Supporting health equity efforts, including for rural and underserved communities.§ 3410. Public reports and databases.(a) Public access.--The council shall release public reports that provide information on:(1) Consumer access to cost and quality comparisons to facilitate shopping for health care services. Consumer access shall include a data visualization tool that is user-friendly, mobile-friendly and available in multiple languages.(2) Links to insurer patient portals to permit access by covered individuals to policy-specific information.(3) Analysis of trends in health care services utilization, pricing, expenditures and cost drivers.(4) Geographic and other variations in medical care and costs throughout this Commonwealth, accounting for differences in the classification and severity of illness of patients and populations, as appropriate and feasible, and taking into consideration the cost impact of subsidization for uninsured and government-sponsored patients and teaching expenses , when feasible with available data . (5) Public data to support analysis of network adequacy, claim authorizations and denials and premium rates.20250HB1739PN2141 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Public report format.--The council must make public reports available in accessible formats and languages as follows:(1) Text must be easy to understand and consumer-friendly.(2) Digital information must be in a digital, machine-readable format that can be imported or read into a computer system for further processing.(3) Both text and digital information shall, to the maximum extent possible, be accessible to individuals with disabilities who may receive services from an entity that is the subject of the report.(4) The report shall be in English and , to the maximum extent possible, in the languages spoken by individuals with limited English proficiency who may receive services from an entity that is the subject of the report.(c) Public report timing.--Beginning September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the council shall issue public reports regarding claims information relating to the prior calendar year. The council may issue additional interim reports.(d) Publicly accessible databases.--The council shall develop and maintain databases to:(1) Facilitate independent research.(2) Facilitate understandable and reliable public access that will enable consumers to assess quality and out-of-pocket costs before receiving health care services.§ 3411. Confidentiality and information sharing.(a) Information sharing.--The council may only share data in accordance with sections 3306 (relating to data dissemination and publication), 3308 (relating to Right-to-Know Law and access 20250HB1739PN2141 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to council data) and 3311 (relating to research and demonstration projects). Except as provided under sections 3306, 3308, 3311 and subsections (c) and (d), data and information produced by, obtained by or disclosed to the council or another person in the course of the exercise of the council's powers and duties under this chapter:(1) Shall be confidential.(2) Shall not be subject to subpoena.(3) Shall not be subject to the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(4) Shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in a private civil action.(5) May not be made public by the council or any other person.(b) Personal health and financial information.--The council shall protect personally identifiable health and financial information collected or received under this chapter in accordance with all applicable Federal and State laws and regulations, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936), the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5, 123 Stat. 226-279 and 467-496) and implementing regulations.(c) Data and information disclosure.-- Subject to the confidentiality provisions of this section:(1) The council shall share identifiable raw data and information received to assist with the duties and responsibilities or for compliance with Federal law, to the following : (i) The Insurance Department.20250HB1739PN2141 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The Department of Human Services.(iii) The Department of Health.(iv) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(v) The Department of Aging.(2) The council may share de-identified data and information received with the Rural Health Redesign Center Authority or a successor organization to assist in the performance of the council's or authority's duties and responsibilities.(3) To the extent permitted by Federal and State law, the council may receive and share de-identified data and information, including the data and information enumerated under section 3407 (relating to data collection) from other jurisdictions, as follows:(i) The council shall maintain as confidential data or information received from regulatory agencies or law enforcement officials in other jurisdictions in which the data and information are confidential by law in those jurisdictions. Data and information obtained by the council under this paragraph shall be confidential as provided under subsection (a).(ii) The council may share de-identified data and information with regulatory agencies or law enforcement officials in other jurisdictions if, prior to receiving the data or information, a regulatory agency or law enforcement official demonstrates by written statement the necessary authority and intent to provide to it the same confidential treatment as required by this chapter.(4) Data and information may be disclosed in only a de-identified form, unless:20250HB1739PN2141 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) otherwise provided under this section; or(ii) if the prior written authorization of the person to which the information pertains has been obtained.(d) Public access.--(1) The following are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of this section:(i) Public hearing testimony.(ii) Public interest review final reports.(iii) De-identified data and information collected by the APCD that is contained within a public report or database prepared or maintained under this chapter.(2) The council shall post de-identified public reports on the council's publicly accessible Internet website. The council shall electronically provide notice of the posting of a de-identified public report to the chair and minority chair of:(i) The Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate.(ii) The Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(iv) The Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(v) The Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the council from accessing data and information n ecessary to carry out its responsibilities in 20250HB1739PN2141 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with law . (f) Unauthorized use of data or information.--A person that knowingly releases to an unauthorized person identifiable data or information in violation of the provisions of this section commits a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of up to $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than five years, or both. An unauthorized person that knowingly receives or possesses the identifiable data or information commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.(g) Unauthorized access to data or information.--If a person inadvertently or by error gains access to data or information that violates the provisions of this section, the data or information must immediately be returned, without duplication, to the council with proper notification of the error. § 3412. Grievances.A data supplier may challenge a finding that its data failed validation or may challenge a finding in a report using the grievance procedures in section 3312 (relating to grievances and grievance procedures) . § 3413. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Compliance.--A payor or provider shall comply with any request for data for the APCD that is necessary for the APCD administrator to carry out the duties and responsibilities under this chapter.(b) General enforcement authority.--(1) The Insurance Department, the Department of Health, the Department of State and the Office of Attorney General shall have authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter against a data supplier identified in section 3407(a) 20250HB1739PN2141 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to data collection), other than a nongovernmental payor that is licensed or otherwise subject to each entity's respective regulatory authority. The appropriate authority may investigate potential violations of this chapter based upon information received from individuals, insurers, providers and other sources in order to ensure compliance with this chapter.(2) Upon receipt or discovery of evidence of a potential violation of this chapter, the council, the Insurance Department, the Department of Health, the Department of State or the Office of Attorney General may refer the matter for enforcement to another agency identified in paragraph (1).(3) Nothing in this chapter shall limit the ability of the Insurance Department, the Department of Health, the Department of State or the Office of Attorney General from using information received under this chapter in the course of its regulatory duties under any other law.(c) Council enforcement.--In addition to the enforcement and penalties under section 3310 (relating to enforcement and penalty), the council may refer to another agency any instance of noncompliance by a payor or provider under subsection (b)(2).(d) Insurance Department enforcement.--In addition to subsection (h):(1) Upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of this chapter by a person regulated by the Insurance Department, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, impose any of the penalties under section 5 of the act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(2) The enforcement remedies imposed under this section 20250HB1739PN2141 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable statute, including the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(3) A violation of this chapter by an insurer is defined to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice pursuant to the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(e) Department of State enforcement.--A violation of this chapter by a person licensed by the Department of State shall constitute unprofessional conduct and subject the person to disciplinary action under the applicable provisions of the professional licensure statute under which the individual is licensed.(f) Department of Health enforcement.--In addition to subsection (h), a violation of this chapter by a licensee of the Department of Health shall be deemed a violation of and subject the violating licensee to penalties provided for in the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(g) Office of Attorney General enforcement.--In addition to subsection (h) , a violation of this chapter is a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(h) Penalties.--(1) In addition to the penalties under subsections (c), (d), (e), (f) and (g), a person that violates this chapter is subject to the following:(i) Suspension, revocation or refusal to renew a license or registration of the violating person.20250HB1739PN2141 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) A cease and desist order.(iii) Supervision, including through a consent order.(iv) A civil penalty in accordance with the following:(A) For a violation of this chapter for a person that did not know nor reasonably should have known was a violation, not more than $50,000 for each violation.(B) For a violation of this chapter for a person that knew or reasonably should have known was a violation, not more than $100,000 for each action in willful violation of this chapter.(C) In any event, not to exceed $250,000 per day or $2,500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(v) For a violation of this chapter by a not-for-profit entity, referral to the Office of Attorney General for a review of its charitable exemption.(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, fines collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the General Fund.(3) Two or more authorities may not impose a penalty on the same insurer or provider for the same violation. A department or office of the Commonwealth that imposes a penalty under this chapter shall notify the council of the imposition of a penalty.(h.1) Deposit.--Penalties imposed under other statutes for a violation of this chapter shall be deposited in the fund specified in the professional licensure statute under which the 20250HB1739PN2141 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disciplinary action is taken.(i) Other remedies and penalties .--The enforcement remedies and penalties imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable statute.(j) Administrative practice and procedure.--The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to the Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1739PN2141 - 26 - 12345678910111213